New Mexico, session 2026, SB6.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five hundred forty-six million six hundred thousand dollars ($546,600,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of the university of New Mexico for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 through 2030 to construct, equip and furnish a new school of medicine facility. Any unexpended balance remaining six months after completion of the project or no later than the end of fiscal year 2030 shall revert to the general fund. .232823.3